Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB189.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 212.190 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The health officer of counties that do not have a county department of health shall
receive a reasonable compensation, the amount of which shall be fixed by the fiscal
court at the time of, or immediately after, his election, and to be paid as other
county officers are paid. In no case shall such health officer claim or receive from
the county any compensation other than the salary fixed by the fiscal court.
(2) The health officer of counties having a county department of health shall receive a
salary to be fixed by the county board of health subject to the approval of the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services. He or she shall receive necessary traveling
expenses.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/14/2025 10:05 AM Jacketed